Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 22

Rights-of-Way

54-22-101. Presumptions — Eminent domain — Fences.

Wherever the state proposes to improve a section of an existing two-lane undivided public road, the width of the right-of-way of which cannot be ascertained totally or partially by instruments of conveyance, court orders or otherwise, there shall be a presumption that the unascertained width is twenty-five feet (25') on either side of the centerline of the traveled portion of the road. This presumption is rebuttable only and if necessary in the judgment of the commissioner of transportation to effect the intent of this part, the state shall acquire the adjoining property by negotiation or by eminent domain. Fences in place for the prescriptive period shall be considered ownership.

Acts 1985, ch. 265, § 1.

Cross-References. Eminent domain by public agencies, title 29, ch. 17.

Relocation of utilities, title 54, ch. 5, part 8.

Removal or destruction of building or structure, § 29-17-911.

Attorney General Opinions. Under the provisions of T.C.A. §§ 54-22-102 and 54-22-103, the state is financially responsible for the necessary removal of any utility located entirely on the presumptive right-of-way claimed by the state pursuant to T.C.A. § 54-22-101, OAG 02-129 (11/26/02).

Comparative Legislation. Rights-of-way:

Ala. Code § 23-1-45.

Ark. Code § 27-67-304 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-1-3 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 176.010 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 228.060.

N.C. Gen Stat. § 136-44.11.

Va. Code § 33.1-137 et seq.

Collateral References. 39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets, and Bridges § 62 et seq.

39A C.J.S. Highways § 135 et seq.

Highways
1 et seq.

54-22-102. Relocation of above-ground utilities and encroachments.

The state shall be responsible for the necessary removal of any above-ground utilities located entirely on the presumptive right-of-way, and shall relocate the utilities on another location within the proposed right-of-way, or on other land that may be acquired.

The state also shall be responsible for the removal and relocation to other land that may be acquired, of other above-ground encroachments that may be accomplished reasonably and economically, if the owner or owners so elect; but encroachments that the owner or owners do not elect to have removed and relocated, after reasonable notice, as encroachments that cannot reasonably or economically be removed, may be disposed of summarily.

Those parts of any above-ground utilities located partially on the presumptive right-of-way and necessary to be removed, may be removed and relocated by the state on another location within the proposed right-of-way or on other land that may be acquired unless the owner or owners elect, after reasonable notice, to remove the remainder located within the existing right-of-way between the limits of the proposed improvement and pro-rate the cost of their entire removal and relocation.

Those parts of other above-ground encroachments may be removed by the state to the extent they encroach, unless the owner or owners elect, after reasonable notice, to remove the remainder and pro-rate the cost of their entire removal.

Acts 1985, ch. 265, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Relocation of utilities, title 54, ch. 5, part 8.

Attorney General Opinions. Under the provisions of T.C.A. §§ 54-22-102 and 54-22-103, the state is financially responsible for the necessary removal of any utility located entirely on the presumptive right-of-way claimed by the state pursuant to T.C.A. § 54-22-101, OAG 02-129 (11/26/02).

The state is financially responsible for the cost of utility relocation under certain circumstances specified in T.C.A. § 54-5-804, OAG 02-129 (11/26/02).

54-22-103. Relocation of below-ground utilities and encroachments.

The state shall be responsible for the necessary removal of any below-ground utilities located entirely on the presumptive right-of-way and shall relocate the utilities on another location within the proposed right-of-way, or on other land that may be acquired.

The state also shall be responsible for the removal and relocation to other land that may be acquired, of other below-ground encroachments that may be accomplished reasonably and economically, if the owner or owners so elect; but encroachments that the owner or owners do not elect to have removed and relocated, after reasonable notice, as encroachments that cannot reasonably or economically be removed, may be disposed of summarily.

Those parts of any below-ground utilities located partially on the presumptive right-of-way and necessary to be removed, may be removed and relocated by the state on another location within the proposed right-of-way or on other land that may be acquired unless the owner or owners elect, after reasonable notice, to remove and relocate the remainder located within the existing right-of-way between the limits of the proposed improvement and pro-rate the cost of their entire removal and relocation.

Those parts of other below-ground encroachments may be removed by the state to the extent they encroach, unless the owner or owners elect, after reasonable notice, to remove the remainder and pro-rate the cost of their entire removal.

Acts 1985, ch. 265, §§ 4, 5.

Cross-References. Relocation of utilities, title 54, ch. 5, part 8.

Attorney General Opinions. Under the provisions of T.C.A. §§ 54-22-102 and 54-22-103, the state is financially responsible for the necessary removal of any utility located entirely on the presumptive right-of-way claimed by the state pursuant to T.C.A. § 54-22-101, OAG 02-129 (11/26/02).

The state is financially responsible for the cost of utility relocation under certain circumstances specified in T.C.A. § 54-5-804, OAG 02-129 (11/26/02).

54-22-104. State eminent domain powers.

The state is vested with full powers of eminent domain in the premises.

Acts 1985, ch. 265, § 6.

54-22-105. Actions at law in inverse eminent domain.

Any person claiming title to land presumed to be owned by the state shall have the right to file an action at law in inverse eminent domain within two (2) years from the date actual possession is taken, saving, however, to unknown owners and nonresidents, twelve (12) months after actual knowledge of possession, not exceeding two (2) years, and saving to persons under the disabilities of infancy and unsoundness of mind, twelve (12) months after the disability is removed, but not exceeding two (2) years, except those claims required to be asserted as a compulsory counterclaim.

Acts 1985, ch. 265, § 7.

Cross-References. Eminent domain by public agencies, title 29, ch. 17.